Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 50B.04 RCW to read as follows:(1) A qualified individual may elect to transfer any or all of the qualified individual's available benefit units to the qualified individual's spouse if the receiving spouse:(a)(i) Does not meet the criteria to be a qualified individual under RCW 50B.04.050; and(ii) Following an evaluation, is determined to meet the functional criteria necessary to become an eligible beneficiary as established in RCW 50B.04.060; or(b)(i) Has met the criteria to be a qualified individual under RCW 50B.04.050;(ii) Following an evaluation, is determined to meet the functional criteria necessary to become an eligible beneficiary as established in RCW 50B.04.060; and(iii) Has exhausted the benefit units available to the receiving spouse under the program.(2) A qualified individual who transfers benefit units to a spouse shall have the amount of transferred units deducted from the amount of benefit units available to the qualified individual who makes the transfer.--- END ---